Georgia, session 2025_26, SB190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to general provisions of parks, historic areas, memorials, and recreation, is amended
by revising Code Section 12-3-9.1, relating to discount for certain disabled veterans, as
follows:
"12-3-9.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Active duty member' means a member of the United States armed forces serving on
a full-time basis.
S. B. 190
- 1 -

LC 46 1109
(1) 'Disabled veteran' means a veteran discharged under honorable conditions from any
branch of the armed forces of the United States who has a physical disability which was
incurred during the period of service in the armed forces and who is a resident of the
State of Georgia.
(2) 'Armed forces' means the United States army, navy, marine corps, space force, coast
guard, air force, Georgia National Guard, or other reserve unit of the United States
military.
(2)(3) 'Fee' means the charge or fee established by the Board of Natural Resources for
the use or occupancy of any state park, historic site, or recreational area and specifically
includes, but is not limited to, entrance or admittance fees, rental fees for cabins or other
overnight lodgings, rental fees for campsites, and fees for the use of golf courses or other
recreational facilities.
(4) 'Gold Star family member' means an immediate family member of a deceased
member of the armed forces who died in the line of duty.
(5) 'Immediate family member' means a parent, child, spouse, brother, or sister.
(6) 'Veteran' means a former member of the armed forces who received an honorable
discharge.
(b) Any disabled veteran Gold Star family member may apply to the commissioner of
veterans service for certification as a disabled veteran Gold Star family member as defined
by paragraph (1) (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section. The commissioner of veterans
service is authorized and directed to certify such applicants applicant as disabled veterans
a Gold Star family member and to issue to such applicants applicant such proof of
certification as the commissioner finds appropriate. The commissioner of veterans service
may shall by rule or regulation require such documentation as may be necessary to certify
disabled veterans a Gold Star family member as provided in this subsection.
(c) Any disabled veteran, active duty member, or Gold Star family member who is
certified as such by the commissioner of veterans service as provided in subsection (b) of
S. B. 190
- 2 -

LC 46 1109
this Code section shall be granted a discount of 25 percent waiver of the fee otherwise
applicable at any state park, historic site, or recreational area operated by or pursuant to the
authority of the Department of Natural Resources or any division or other agency of said
department.
(d) The discount waiver provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section:
(1) Shall apply to rental fees for cabins, campsites, or other overnight accommodations
for the disabled veteran and members of the disabled veteran's immediate family who
occupy any disabled veteran, active duty member, or Gold Star family member who
occupies the overnight accommodations with the disabled veteran; and
(2) Shall not apply to rental or use fees for any group facilities or accommodations.
(e) The Department of Natural Resources shall promulgate rules and regulations for
verifying eligibility, issuing passes, and promoting the program described in this Code
section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 190
- 3 -